Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-326
Veterans' Home Building Fund; created; purposes; investment.

The Veterans' Home Building Fund is created. The fund shall include money allocated to the fund. The fund shall be used, along with matching federal funds available, for the specific purposes of adding or improving nursing facilities when needed. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1978, LB 315, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1216, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 17;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 94;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-301.02;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 15.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.